Maryland, session 2025, HB0325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
11–808.
(a) An individual may obtain a high school diploma by examination as provided
in this section if the individual:
(1) has not obtained a high school diploma;
(2) resides in this State; and
(3) except as provided in subsection (b) of this section:
(i) is not subject to compulsory school attendance under § 7–301 of
the Education Article; and
(ii) has withdrawn from a regular full–time public or private school
program.
(b) An individual is not subject to the requirements of subsection (a)(3) of this
section if the individual participates in a GED Option Program administered by the State
Department of Education that creates a pathway to a high school diploma by examination
for currently enrolled high school English language learner students under the age of 21
years who have experienced interrupted education and have a lower level of English
proficiency than their peers.
(c) The Department shall:
(1) offer examinations to individuals who are pursuing a high school
diploma under this subtitle at least twice each year at places throughout the State that are
reasonably convenient for the applicants; AND
(2) ALLOW AN INDIVIDUAL TO CHOOSE TO TAKE ALL COMPONENTS OF
THE EXAMINATION IN THE SAME LANGUAGE FROM THE ENGLISH OR SPANISH

HOUSE BILL 325 3
LANGUAGE EXAMINATIONS OFFERED BY THE DEPARTMENT EITHER ENGLISH OR
SPANISH.
(d) The examination shall:
(1) be offered in appropriate high school subject areas; and
(2) be of a comprehensive nature as determined by the State Board of
Education.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) The Maryland Department of Labor shall:
(1) identify other appropriate languages in which to offer the General
Educational Development Test for adult learners in the State; and
(2) study the feasibility and cost of offering the examination in additional
languages.
(b) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department shall submit, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, a report of its findings and
recommendations from the study required under this section to the Senate Finance
Committee and the House Committee on Ways and Means.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.